Utah statutes.
10-2-124.   Incorporation petition or feasibility study before May 8, 2012.

(1)  A party with a petition in process as of January 1, 2012, and not yet filed for final certification with the county clerk in accordance with Section 10-2-110 as of May 8, 2012, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter as enacted on May 8, 2012, except as provided in Subsection (3).

(2)  A party described in Subsection (1) may use a signature on a petition in process as of May 8, 2012, to fulfill the requirements of this chapter enacted on May 8, 2012.

(3)  If on or before May 8, 2012, a feasibility study has been completed for a party described in Subsection (1):

(a)  the completed feasibility study shall fulfill the requirements of this section; and

(b)  the party is not required to request a new feasibility study.

